Maine, session 132, LD1016.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §9090-A is enacted to read:
§9090-A. Transfer assessment
1. Fee payment required. The purchaser of a manufactured housing community shall
pay to the registry of deeds of the county where all or a majority of the acreage of the
purchased real property associated with the manufactured housing community is located a
fee equal to $10,000 for each manufactured housing community lot in the manufactured
housing community. The money must be paid to the registry of deeds when the deed of
the manufactured housing community is offered for recordation.
2. Exceptions. The following entities are not required to pay the fee under subsection
1:
A. The Maine State Housing Authority;
B. A municipal housing authority as defined in Title 30-A, section 4702, subsection
10-A;
C. A cooperative or other entity in which membership is limited to manufactured home
owners; and
D. Entities, together with affiliated and related entities, that have a net worth of less
than $50,000,000.
3. Attestation of net worth. An entity claiming an exemption under subsection 2,
paragraph D shall provide the register of deeds with an attestation of net worth when the
deed for the manufactured housing community is offered for recordation and any other
information or documentation as required by the Department of Professional and Financial
Regulation by rule.
4. Evidence of payment; disposition of fee. Evidence of the fee payment under
subsection 1 or an exception to the fee requirement under subsection 2 must be retained by
the registry of deeds of the county where all or a majority of the acreage of the purchased
Page 1 - 132LR2156(06)

real property associated with the manufactured housing community is located in a manner
established by the register of deeds. The register of deeds shall, on or before the 10th day
of each month, pay to the Treasurer of State 95% of the fee collected pursuant to this section
during the previous month. The remaining 5% must be retained for the county by the
register of deeds and accounted for to the county treasurer as reimbursement for services
rendered by the registry of deeds in collecting the fee.
5. Distribution of State's share of proceeds. The State Controller shall credit all fees
received pursuant to this section to the Manufactured Housing Community and Mobile
Home Park Preservation and Assistance Fund established in Title 30-A, section 4754-B.
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA §9094-B is enacted to read:
§9094-B. Transfer assessment
1. Fee payment required. The purchaser of a mobile home park shall pay to the
registry of deeds of the county where all or a majority of the acreage of the mobile home
park is located a fee equal to $10,000 for each mobile home park lot within the mobile
home park. The money must be paid to the registry of deeds when the deed of the mobile
home park is offered for recordation.
2. Exceptions. The following entities are not required to pay the fee under subsection
1:
A. The Maine State Housing Authority;
B. A municipal housing authority as defined in Title 30-A, section 4702, subsection
10-A;
C. A cooperative or other entity in which membership is limited to mobile home
owners; and
D. Entities, together with affiliated and related entities, that have a net worth of less
than $50,000,000.
3. Attestation of net worth. An entity claiming an exemption under subsection 2,
paragraph D shall provide the register of deeds with an attestation of net worth when the
deed for the mobile home park is offered for recordation and any other information or
documentation as required by the Department of Professional and Financial Regulation by
rule.
4. Evidence of payment; disposition of fee. Evidence of the fee payment under
subsection 1 or an exception to the fee requirement under subsection 2 must be retained by
the registry of deeds of the county where all or a majority of the acreage of the mobile
home park is located in a manner established by the register of deeds. The register of deeds
shall, on or before the 10th day of each month, pay to the Treasurer of State 95% of the
fees collected pursuant to this section during the previous month. The remaining 5% must
be retained for the county by the register of deeds and accounted for to the county treasurer
as reimbursement for services rendered by the county in collecting the fee.
5. Distribution of State's share of proceeds. The State Controller shall credit all fees
received pursuant to this section to the Manufactured Housing Community and Mobile
Home Park Preservation and Assistance Fund established in Title 30-A, section 4754-B.
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §4754-B is enacted to read:
Page 2 - 132LR2156(06)

§4754-B. Manufactured Housing Community and Mobile Home Park Preservation
and Assistance Fund
The Manufactured Housing Community and Mobile Home Park Preservation and
Assistance Fund, referred to in this section as "the fund," is established within the Maine
State Housing Authority as a nonlapsing, dedicated fund to be administered for the
purposes described in subsection 1.
1. Purpose. The Maine State Housing Authority shall administer the fund to maintain
housing affordability in manufactured housing communities and mobile home parks,
regulated by Title 10, chapter 951, subchapter 6 and chapter 953, respectively, to support
ownership of manufactured housing communities and mobile home parks by homeowners,
homeowners' associations, resident-owned housing cooperatives or other nonprofit entities
representing the interests of homeowners in manufactured housing communities or mobile
home parks.
2. Source of funds. The State Controller shall transfer to the fund the money collected
under Title 10, sections 9090-A and 9094-B. The fund may accept revenue from grants,
bequests, gifts or contributions from any source, public or private, including any sums that
may be appropriated by the Legislature, transferred to the fund from time to time by the
State Controller dedicated to the fund pursuant to law.
Sec. 4. Department of Professional and Financial Regulation; rules. The
Department of Professional and Financial Regulation shall adopt rules to establish a
method for determining the net worth of an entity, together with affiliated and related
entities, claiming an exemption from the fees required by the Maine Revised Statutes, Title
10, section 9090-A, subsection 1 and 9094-B, subsection 1. The rules must include the
evidence and documentation necessary for a purchaser of a manufactured housing
community or a mobile home park to provide to the register of deeds when offering a deed
for recordation and the record-keeping obligations of the register of deeds. When
developing rules, the department shall consider whether information on the incorporation
of the entity is useful. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as
defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 5. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Manufactured Housing Community and Mobile Home Park Preservation and
Assistance Fund N523
Initiative: Provides base allocations to authorize expenditures to support ownership of
manufactured housing communities and mobile home parks by owners of manufactured
homes and mobile homes.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Page 3 - 132LR2156(06)